Missouri, session 2026, SB1709.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 9.021, to read as
follows:
9.021. The last full week of September each year shall
be known as "Frontotemporal Degeneration (FTD) Awareness
Week" in Missouri. Frontotemporal degeneration, also
frequently referred to as frontotemporal dementia,
represents a group of brain disorders caused by degeneration
of the frontal or temporal lobes of the brain, representing
the most common form of dementia for people under the age of
sixty. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities that will
increase awareness of frontotemporal degeneration, to
support programs of research and education surrounding
frontotemporal degeneration, and to support individuals and
families impacted by frontotemporal degeneration.
✓